Washington statutes.
RCW 41.59.031

Application of chapter to charter schools.

This chapter applies to any charter school established under chapter 28A.710 RCW. Any bargaining unit or units established at the charter school must be limited to employees working in the charter school and must be separate from other bargaining units in school districts, educational service districts, or institutions of higher education. Any charter school established under chapter 28A.710 RCW is a separate employer from any school district, including the school district in which it is located.

[ 2016 c 241 s 138. Prior: 2013 c 2 s 308 (Initiative Measure No. 1240, approved November 6, 2012).]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 241: See RCW 28A.710.901.